Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 5. Wyoming Sanitarium

§§ 35-2-501 through 35-2-503.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1982, ch. 62, § 4.

Cross references. —

For provisions as to establishment, purpose and maintenance fund of the Wyoming pioneer home and retirement center, see chapter 8 of title 25.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1921, ch. 169, §§ 1, 2, related to the Wyoming sanitarium.